District of Columbia statutes.
7-1201.04

General rules governing disclosures.

(a)

Upon disclosure of any of the client’s mental health information pursuant to subchapter II, III, or IV of this chapter, a notation shall be entered and maintained with the client’s record of mental health information which includes:

(1)

The date of the disclosure;

(2)

The name of the recipient of the mental health information; and

(3)

A description of the contents of the disclosure.

(b)

All disclosures of mental health information, except on an emergency basis as provided in § 7-1203.03, shall be accompanied by a statement to the effect that: The unauthorized disclosure of mental health information violates the provisions of the District of Columbia Mental Health Information Act of 1978 (§§ 7-1201.01 to 7-1207.02). Disclosures may only be made pursuant to a valid authorization by the client or as provided in title III or IV of that Act. The Act provides for civil damages and criminal penalties for violations.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 104, 25 DCR 5055
1981 Ed., § 6-2004.
1973 Ed., § 6-1614.